Utah statutes.
58-60-305.5.   Qualification for licensure before May 1, 2000.

(1)  A person who was licensed under this chapter as of May 1, 2000, may apply for renewal of licensure without being required to fulfill the educational requirements described in Subsection 58-60-305(1)(d).

(2)  A person who seeks licensure under this chapter before July 1, 2002, need comply only with the licensure requirements in effect before May 1, 2000.

